Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska1-107
Nebraska State Board of Public Accountancy; creation; membership; appointment; qualifications; terms; vacancies; removal; reappointment.

There is hereby created the Nebraska State Board of Public Accountancy. The board shall consist of eight members appointed by the Governor.

Six members of the board shall be holders of permits issued under subdivision (1)(a) of section 1-136, and two members of the board shall be laypersons.

All members of the board shall be citizens of the United States and residents of Nebraska. Two of the members of the board, who are holders of permits, shall reside in each congressional district. Two members shall be appointed to the board each year for terms of four years. Vacancies occurring during a term shall be filled by appointment for the unexpired term. Upon the expiration of his or her term of office a member shall continue to serve until his or her successor has been appointed and qualified. The Governor shall remove from the board any member whose permit has become void or has been revoked or suspended and may, after hearing, remove any member of the board for neglect of duty or other just cause. No person who has served two complete terms of four years shall be eligible for reappointment. Appointment to fill an unexpired term shall not be considered a complete term.

Laws 1957, c. 1, § 2, p. 55;

Laws 1961, c. 1, § 1, p. 59;

Laws 1971, LB 858, § 1;

Laws 1979, LB 414, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 92, § 1;

Laws 1984, LB 473, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 4.